Utah statutes.
63M-1-909.5.   Selection of educational technology provider to implement whole-school technology deployment plan for schools.

The board shall select an educational technology provider to develop and implement a whole-school technology deployment plan for schools in accordance with the requirements of this part and Section 53A-1-709.



Enacted by Chapter 208, 2012 General Session

